New York, session 2025-2026, A7556.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 134 of the economic development law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 13 to read as follows: 3 13. (a) in consultation with the secretary of state, maintain a public 4 online registry of vacant commercial storefronts. The online registry 5 shall be designed and promoted to current and prospective small business 6 owners seeking to purchase or lease a vacant storefront for a small 7 business location. The registry shall include, but not be limited to: 8 i. the address of the vacant commercial storefront; 9 ii. the contact information of the seller, leasing party, or agent 10 authorized to conduct such transactions for the purchase or renting of 11 the vacant commercial storefront; and 12 iii. information regarding the property's potential usages. 13 (b) The division shall accept suggested entries to the online registry 14 from state agencies, municipalities, local economic development agen- 15 cies, and other relevant entities. The division shall consult with other 16 state agencies to verify the information to be included in the online 17 registry and shall promulgate the rules and regulations for collecting 18 and maintaining the requisite data. The registry must be made available 19 within one year after the effective date of this subdivision. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 21 it shall have become law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11015-03-5